District of Columbia statutes.
11-1905

Master juror list.

(a)

The jury system plan shall provide for the compilation and maintenance by the Board of Judges of a master juror list from which names of prospective jurors shall be drawn. Such master juror list shall consist of the list of District of Columbia voters, and names from such other appropriate sources and lists as may be provided in the jury system plan.

(b)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon request of the Board of Judges any person having custody, possession, or control of any list required under subsection (a) shall provide such list to the Court, at cost, at all reasonable times. Each list shall contain the names and addresses of individuals on the list. Any list obtained by the Court under the provisions of this chapter may be used by the Court only for the selection of jurors pursuant to this chapter.

Nov. 14, 1986, 100 Stat. 3635, Pub. L. 99-650, § 2
This section is referenced in § 16-5104, § 47-1805.04, and § 47-4406.
1981 Ed., § 11-1905.
Short title: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 11-1901.